Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2649.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Findings and purpose.
(1) Rhode Island’s public education system guarantees every child the right to attend school
in their city or town of residence, pursuant to R.I. Gen. Laws §16-64-1.
(2) In practice, many districts assign students to specific schools within the district based
on geographic zones or catchment areas.
(3) Such boundaries were designed for administrative convenience, not to limit equitable
access to public education.
(4) It is contrary to the public interest that open seats remain unfilled in one part of a district
while students elsewhere face overcrowding or lack access to quality options.
(5) Every publicly funded seat should be made available to students residing in the same
district before the district seeks additional resources or capital expansion.
(6) Therefore, the General Assembly declares that within-district access to open public
school seats is a matter of fairness, efficiency, and educational opportunity.
SECTION 2. Section 16-64-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-64 entitled "Residence
of Children for School Purposes" is hereby amended to read as follows:
16-64-1. Residency of children for school purposes.
(a) Except as provided by law or by agreement, a child shall be enrolled in the school
system of the city or town where he or she resides. A child shall be deemed to be a resident of the

city or town where his or her parents reside. If the child’s parents reside in different cities or towns
the child shall be deemed to be a resident of the city or town in which the parent having actual
custody of the child resides. In cases where a child has no living parents, has been abandoned by
his or her parents, or when parents are unable to care for their child on account of parental illness
or family break-up, the child shall be deemed to be a resident of the city or town where the child
lives with his or her legal guardian, natural guardian, or other person acting in loco parentis to the
child. An emancipated minor shall be deemed to be a resident of the city or town where he or she
lives. Children placed in group homes, in foster care, in child caring facilities, or by a Rhode Island
state agency or a Rhode Island licensed child placing agency shall be deemed to be residents of the
city or town where the group home, child caring facility, or foster home is located for the purposes
of enrollment, and this city or town shall be reimbursed or the child’s education shall be paid for in
accordance with § 16-64-1.1. In all other cases a child’s residence shall be determined in
accordance with the applicable rules of the common law. Where a child is a resident in a dwelling
which lies in more than one municipality, the parent(s) or guardian shall choose which school
district the child shall attend without payment of costs as tuition.
(b) In-district access to open seats.
(1) Each school district shall ensure that any public school with available seats, after
completion of the initial enrollment period for students residing in that school’s designated
attendance area, shall make such seats available to other students residing within the same school
district. Nothing herein shall prevent any public school district from establishing rules and
regulations that permit the district to keep a certain amount of seats available for students who
move into the district after the initial enrollment period is completed.
(2) The Rhode Island department of education (“RIDE”) shall, within twelve (12) months
of the effective date of this subsection, by regulation, establish procedures governing the
identification, public posting, and equitable assignment of such open seats including, but not
limited to, timelines, application processes, and lottery mechanisms when applications exceed
available capacity.
(3) Districts may give enrollment priority to siblings of currently enrolled students, students
requiring specialized programs not offered elsewhere, or students residing nearest to the school;
provided that, such priorities are applied consistently and transparently.
(4) No student shall be denied participation in the in-district open seat process on the basis
of race, ethnicity, language status, disability, or socioeconomic status.
(5) Districts shall annually report to RIDE the number of available seats, applications
received, and placements made under this subsection.
LC005509/SUB A - Page 2 of 4

(6) Nothing herein shall be construed to have any impact on the districts existing
transportation policies.
(7) RIDE shall compile and publicly release this data by October 1 of each year.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005509/SUB A
========
LC005509/SUB A - Page 3 of 4